Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-336
Liability; certain payments; how treated.

(1) Sections 75-323 to 75-343 shall not limit the liability of a transportation network company arising out of an automobile accident involving a participating driver in any action for damages against a transportation network company for an amount above the required insurance coverage.

(2) In the event of a loss involving a personal vehicle used in connection with a transportation network company and if such personal vehicle is subject to a lien, the transportation network company insurance carrier shall make payment for a claim covered under collision physical damage coverage or comprehensive physical damage coverage directly to the business repairing the vehicle or jointly to the owner of the vehicle and the primary lienholder on the covered vehicle.

Laws 2015, LB629, § 15.